Idaho, session 2026, S1414.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-6104, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-6104. PUNISHMENT FOR RAPE. Rape is punishable by imprisonment in
the state prison not no less than one (1) year five (5) years, and the im-
prisonment may be extended to life in the discretion of the District Judge
district judge, who shall pass sentence.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.